Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.1. Permit Fees.

§ 62.1-44.15:6.
Permit fee regulations.

The Board shall promulgate regulations establishing a fee assessment and collection system to recover a portion of the State Water Control Board’s, the Department of Wildlife Resources’ and the Department of Conservation and Recreation’s direct and indirect costs associated with the processing of an application to issue, reissue, amend or modify any permit or certificate, which the Board has authority to issue under this chapter and Chapters 24 (§

62.1-242

et seq.) and 25 (§

62.1-254

et seq.) of this title, from the applicant for such permit or certificate for the purpose of more efficiently and expeditiously processing permits. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts. The Board shall have no authority to charge such fees where the authority to issue such permits has been delegated to another agency that imposes permit fees.

Click to viewThe fee for the major modification of a permit or certificate that occurs between the permit issuance and expiration dates shall be 50 percent of the maximum amount established by this subsection. No fees shall be charged for minor modifications or minor amendments to such permits. For the purpose of this subdivision, “minor modifications” or “minor amendments” means specific types of changes defined by the Board that are made to keep the permit current with routine changes to the facility or its operation that do not require extensive review. A minor permit modification or amendment does not substantially alter permit conditions, increase the size of the operation, or reduce the capacity of the facility to protect human health or the environment.

Click to viewAn additional permit maintenance fee of $1,000 shall be collected from facilities in a toxics management program and an additional permit maintenance fee shall be collected from facilities that have more than five process wastewater discharge outfalls. Permit maintenance fees shall be collected annually and shall be remitted by October 1 of each year. For a local government or public service authority with permits for multiple facilities in a single jurisdiction, the permit maintenance fees for permits held as of April 1, 2004, shall not exceed $20,000 per year. No permit maintenance fee shall be assessed for facilities operating under a general permit or for permits pertaining to a farming operation engaged in production for market.

Click to viewNo fees shall be charged for minor modifications or minor amendments to such permits. For the purpose of this subdivision, “minor modifications” or “minor amendments” means specific types of changes defined by the Board that are made to keep the permit current with routine changes to the facility or its operation that do not require extensive review. A minor permit modification or amendment does not substantially alter permit conditions, increase the size of the operation, or reduce the capacity of the facility to protect human health or the environment.

B1.

Permit fees charged an applicant for a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or a Virginia Pollution Abatement permit shall reflect the average time and complexity of processing a permit in each of the various categories of permits and permit actions. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, in no instance shall the Board charge a fee for a permit pertaining to a farming operation engaged in production for market or for a permit pertaining to maintenance dredging for federal navigation channels or other Corps of Engineers- or Department of the Navy-sponsored dredging projects or for the regularly scheduled renewal of an individual permit for an existing facility. Fees shall be charged for a major modification or reissuance of a permit initiated by the permittee that occurs between permit issuance and the stated expiration date. No fees shall be charged for a modification or amendment made at the Board’s initiative. In no instance shall the Board exceed the following amounts for the processing of each type of permit/certificate category:

Type of Permit/Certificate Category Maximum Amount 1. Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Major Industrial $24,000 Major Municipal $21,300 Minor Industrial with nonstandard limits $10,300 Minor Industrial with standard limits $ 6,600 Minor Municipal greater than 100,000 gallons per day $ 7,500 Minor Municipal 10,001-100,000 gallons per day $ 6,000 Minor Municipal 1,000-10,000 gallons per day $ 5,400 Minor Municipal less than 1,000 gallons per day $ 2,000 General-industrial stormwater management $ 500 General-stormwater management-phase I land clearing $ 500 General-stormwater management-phase II land clearing $ 300 General-other $ 600 2. Virginia Pollution Abatement Industrial/Wastewater 10 or more inches per year $15,000 Industrial/Wastewater less than 10 inches per year $10,500 Industrial/Sludge $ 7,500 Municipal/Wastewater $13,500 Municipal/Sludge $ 7,500 General Permit $ 600 Other $ 750

B2.

Each permitted facility shall pay a permit maintenance fee to the Board by October 1 of each year, not to exceed the following amounts:

Type of Permit/Certificate Category Maximum Amount 1. Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Major Industrial $ 4,800 Major Municipal greater than 10 million gallons per day $ 4,750 Major Municipal 2-10 million gallons per day $ 4,350 Major Municipal less than 2 million gallons per day $ 3,850 Minor Industrial with nonstandard limits $ 2,040 Minor Industrial with standard limits $ 1,320 Minor Industrial water treatment system $ 1,200 Minor Municipal greater than 100,000 gallons per day $ 1,500 Minor Municipal 10,001-100,000 gallons per day $ 1,200 Minor Municipal 1,000-10,000 gallons per day $ 1,080 Minor Municipal less than 1,000 gallons per day $ 400 2. Virginia Pollution Abatement Industrial/Wastewater 10 or more inches per year $ 3,000 Industrial/Wastewater less than 10 inches per year $ 2,100 Industrial/Sludge $ 3,000 Municipal/Wastewater $ 2,700 Municipal/Sludge $ 1,500

B3.

Permit application fees charged for Virginia Water Protection Permits, ground water withdrawal permits, and surface water withdrawal permits shall reflect the average time and complexity of processing a permit in each of the various categories of permits and permit actions and the size of the proposed impact. Only one permit fee shall be assessed for a water protection permit involving elements of more than one category of permit fees under this section. The fee shall be assessed based upon the primary purpose of the proposed activity. In no instance shall the Board charge a fee for a permit pertaining to maintenance dredging for federal navigation channels or other U.S. Army Corps of Engineers- or Department of the Navy-sponsored dredging projects, and in no instance shall the Board exceed the following amounts for the processing of each type of permit/certificate category:

Type of Permit Maximum Amount 1. Virginia Water Protection Individual-wetland impacts $2,400 plus $220 per 1/10 acre of impact over two acres, not to exceed $60,000 Individual-minimum instream flow Individual-reservoir $25,000 Individual-nonmetallic mineral mining General-less than 1/10 acre impact $0 General-1/10 to 1/2 acre impact $600 General-greater than 1/2 to one acre impact $1,200 General-greater than one acre to two acres of impact $120 per 1/10 acre of impact 2. Ground Water Withdrawal $9,000 3. Surface Water Withdrawal $12,000

C.

When promulgating regulations establishing permit fees, the Board shall take into account the permit fees charged in neighboring states and the importance of not placing existing or prospective industries in the Commonwealth at a competitive disadvantage.

D.

Beginning January 1, 1998, and January 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter, the Board shall make a report on the implementation of the water permit program to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Finance. The report shall include the following: (i) the total costs, both direct and indirect, including the costs of overhead, water quality planning, water quality assessment, operations coordination, and surface water and ground water investigations, (ii) the total fees collected by permit category, (iii) the amount of general funds allocated to the Board, (iv) the amount of federal funds received, (v) the Board’s use of the fees, the general funds, and the federal funds, (vi) the number of permit applications received by category, (vii) the number of permits issued by category, (viii) the progress in eliminating permit backlogs, (ix) the timeliness of permit processing, and (x) the direct and indirect costs to neighboring states of administering their water permit programs, including what activities each state categorizes as direct and indirect costs, and the fees charged to the permit holders and applicants.

E.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the Board.

F.

Permit fee schedules shall apply to permit programs in existence on July 1, 1992, any additional permits that may be required by the federal government and administered by the Board, or any new permit required pursuant to any law of the Commonwealth.

G.

The Board is authorized to promulgate regulations establishing a schedule of reduced permit fees for facilities that have established a record of compliance with the terms and requirements of their permits and shall establish criteria by regulation to provide for reductions in the annual fee amount assessed for facilities accepted into the Department’s programs to recognize excellent environmental performance.

History.

1992, cc. 621, 657; 1993, cc. 749, 756; 1995, c. 107; 1997, cc. 115, 154; 2002, c. 822; 2004, cc. 249, 324; 2011, cc. 87, 149; 2018, c. 424; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 822, cl. 3, which amended this section, provided for the expiration of the provisions of Acts 2002, c. 822, effective July 1, 2004. However, Acts 2002, c. 822, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2004, cc. 249 and 324, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of § 10.1-1402.1 shall expire on July 1, 2004.” Therefore, this section is set out with the amendments by Acts 2002, c. 822.

Acts 2002, c. 822, cl. 2, provides: “That the Virginia Waste Management Board and the State Water Control Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2004, cc. 249 and 324, cls. 3 through 7 provide:

“3. That the regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, and the State Water Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia and shall become effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule shall not be exempted from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.).

“4. That it is the General Assembly’s intent that the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall evaluate and implement measures to improve the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of its programs in ensuring the Commonwealth’s air quality, water quality and land resources are protected and to ensure the maximum value from the funding provided for the Commonwealth’s environmental programs. To assist DEQ in accomplishing such goals, a management efficiency peer review shall be conducted of the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit programs and the air permit program implemented by the agency. The review shall evaluate (i) operational changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency’s operations, (ii) ways to reduce the costs of compliance, and (iii) the adequacy and appropriateness of staffing levels to meet state and federal requirements. The review shall be led by a consulting firm with expertise and previous experience in conducting similar reviews of state agencies and private firms and shall include a peer review team appointed by the Director of DEQ, consisting of individuals familiar with the permit program including, but not limited to, persons nominated by the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Chemistry Council, the Virginia Manufacturers Association, the Virginia Municipal League, the Hampton Roads Planning District Commission, and the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies. All individuals serving on the peer review team shall have previous training and experience in preparing applications for permits issued under the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program or the air permitting program. The consulting firm shall be selected by agreement between the Director of DEQ and the peer review team members from the previously mentioned organizations and in accordance with the Virginia Procurement Act. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“5. That a review of DEQ’s solid waste permitting and inspection programs shall be conducted in order to ensure that those programs provide maximum efficiency consistent with protection of the environment and public health. The review shall be conducted by DEQ with the active participation of persons qualified by training and experience in the management and operation of solid waste facilities, who shall be recommended by the Virginia Waste Industries Association, the Solid Waste Association of North America and the Southwest Virginia Solid Waste Management Association. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.

“6. That in order to accomplish the intent of the General Assembly, DEQ shall:

“a. Implement a streamlined permit application to be used for renewals of previously granted environmental permits where there has been no significant change in the permitted activity or applicable statutory or regulatory requirements during the previous permit term. Such streamlined permit renewal application shall be designed, to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, to avoid the submission and duplication of information that has previously been submitted by the applicant and achieve maximum efficiency and economy for both the permittee and DEQ, and DEQ shall work with the peer review team to develop these applications with the goal of minimizing the amount of duplicate, costly work on the part of the permit renewal applicants and DEQ;

“b. Expeditiously implement electronic permitting, filing and reporting procedures so as to improve access to information, reduce the costs of compliance, and reduce costs to DEQ;

“c. Explore ways to reduce compliance costs to the permittee and reduce DEQ’s oversight costs for ensuring compliance. The options to be explored shall include, but not be limited to, increased utilization of certified evaluations (i.e., by professional engineers) as a method of ensuring compliance while reducing the need for physical inspections; and

“d. Encourage efficient and effective environmental performance by deeming a facility’s demonstration of a proven environmental management system, such as ISO 14001, along with a commitment to pollution prevention, annual progress reporting, and a record of sustained compliance as meeting the criteria for acceptance into DEQ’s programs for environmental excellence.

“7. That if general fund revenues in excess of $500,000 per year over the Governor’s submitted budget for natural resources for the 2004-2006 biennium are appropriated by the 2004 Appropriation Act and are allocated for implementation of the water permit programs, the water permit fees set forth in or established pursuant to this act shall be reduced by a pro rata basis.” No appropriation over and above was made; therefore there will be no fee reduction.

Acts 2018, c. 424, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board shall, by a regulation effective January 1, 2019, raise from $6,000 to $9,000 the permit fee applicable to new or reissued individual ground water withdrawal permits or certificates. The adoption of such regulation shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia).”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 275, cl. 1, § 2 provides: “The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality (the Director), or his designee, shall convene a working group for the purpose of developing a schedule of annual maintenance fees for water withdrawal permits including (i) Virginia Water Protection Individual-minimum instream flow permits, (ii) Virginia Water Protection Individual-reservoir permits, (iii) Ground Water Withdrawal permits, and (iv) Surface Water Withdrawal permits. The working group shall include representatives of (a) ground water with withdrawal permittees, including at least one representative each from the municipal, commercial, and industrial sectors; (b) Virginia Water Protection surface water withdrawal permittees, including at least one representative each from the municipal, commercial, and power generation sectors; (c) environmental organizations; (d) agricultural organizations; and (e) any others whom the Director determines would assist the group in its deliberations. The working group shall convene no later than August 1, 2021, and shall meet as necessary thereafter. The Department of Environmental Quality shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2021, a summary of the working group’s discussions and recommendations for a schedule of annual maintenance fees that shall, at a minimum, be sufficient to reflect no less than 40 percent of the direct costs required for the development, administration, compliance, and enforcement of such permits.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 822, in the table in subsection B, deleted the entry for “Waiver” under item 3., “401 Certification/Virginia Water Protection,” and tripled the maximum amount for all remaining entries in the table; deleted the former second paragraph of subsection D, which provided for the inclusion in the initial 1998 report of an analysis and estimate of annual costs of the program to permit holders and applicants at varying apportionment levels; and made stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 249 and 324 are identical, and rewrote former subsection B; and added the language beginning “and shall establish criteria” at the end of subsection G.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 87 and 149 are identical, and in the first paragraph in subsections B1 and B3, inserted “or Department of the Navy-.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 424 substituted “$9,000” for “$6,000” following “2. Ground Water Withdrawal” in the table in subsection B3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources’ ” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries’ ” in subsection A in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 62.1-44.15:7.
Permit Program Fund established; use of moneys.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the State Water Control Board Permit Program Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-1802

, all moneys collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:6

shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund.

Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The Board is authorized and empowered to release moneys from the Fund, on warrants issued by the State Comptroller, for the purposes of recovering portions of the costs of processing applications under this chapter and Chapters 24 (§

62.1-242

et seq.) and 25 (§

62.1-254

et seq.) of this title under the direction of the Executive Director.

An accounting of moneys received by and distributed from the Fund shall be kept by the State Comptroller and furnished upon request to the Governor or the General Assembly.

History.

1992, cc. 621, 657.

§ 62.1-44.15:8.
Conformance with federal requirements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, any fee system developed by the Board may be modified by regulation promulgated by the Board, as may be necessary to conform with the requirements of the federal Clean Water Act and any regulations promulgated thereunder.
Any modification imposed under this section shall be submitted to the members of the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and on Finance and Appropriations; and the House Committees on Appropriations, Conservation and Natural Resources, and Finance.

History.

1992, cc. 621, 657.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and Finance.” March 10, 2021.